lexica/numerals.lexc
LEXICON Numeral

devetsto NumCardIndecInf;
dvesto NumCardIndecInf;
osemsto NumCardIndecInf;
petsto NumCardIndecInf;
sedemsto NumCardIndecInf;
sto NumCardIndecInf;
tristo NumCardIndecInf;
šeststo NumCardIndecInf;
štiristo NumCardIndecInf;
LEXICON Numeral

drug NumPronInf;
eden NumPronInf;
en NumPronInf;
